Utah statutes.
34-29-8.   Taking commission in advance unlawful -- Penalty.
(1)  It is unlawful for any employment agent to receive, directly or
indirectly, any money or other valuable consideration from any person seeking
employment for any information or assistance furnished or to be furnished by
the agent to such person, enabling or tending to enable that person to secure
employment, before the time the information or assistance is actually
furnished.
(2)  An employment agent who violates Subsection (1) is liable to the person
from whom the money or other valuable consideration is received for an amount
equal to twice the amount of money or other valuable consideration paid to the
employment agent.
